Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-243
Deed; record; absence of seal of person taking acknowledgment; when not objectionable.

It shall be no objection to the record of a deed that no official seal is appended to the recorded acknowledgment or proof thereof if, when the acknowledgment or proof purports to have been taken by an officer having an official seal, there is a statement in the certificate of acknowledgment or proof that the same is made under his hand and seal of office, and such statement shall be presumptive evidence that the affixed seal was attached to the original certificate.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 23, p. 285;

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 90;

R.S.1913, § 6218;

C.S.1922, § 5617;

C.S.1929, § 76-223;

R.S.1943, § 76-243.

Failure of notary to write under his official signature the date when his commission will expire does not render his certificate void. Sheridan County v. McKinney, 79 Neb. 223, 115 N.W. 548 (1908).